Utah statutes.
58-83-503.   Unlawful conduct.

Unlawful conduct includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501:

(1)  online prescribing, dispensing or facilitating of a legend drug not authorized by the division in accordance with Section 58-83-306; or

(2)  online prescribing, dispensing or facilitating of a controlled substance.

